New York, session 2025-2026, S3428.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph 47 to read as follows: 3 (47) During the seven day period each year commencing on the Tuesday 4 immediately preceding the first Monday in September, known as Labor Day, 5 and ending on Labor Day, school supplies or items commonly used by a 6 student in a course of study which shall include, but not be limited to, 7 book bags or backpacks, books, computer equipment (including related 8 software and hardware), pens, pencils, highlighters, crayons, markers, 9 erasers, index cards, paper, notebooks, binders, folders, scissors, 10 rulers and calculators. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 12 periods beginning on and after August 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02538-01-5